src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON LÅGENAN	 				
lågenangáktsa:lågenan#gákts GÁKTSA ;  
lågenanaktse:lågenan#akts AKTSE ;   
aktalågenan+Use/-Spell:akta AKTALÅGENAN ;   !old     
